California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(ii) For an applicant with 10 or more employees but less than 20 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 20th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is earlier.

(iii) For an applicant with less than 10
 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 10th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is later.

(iv) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to revoke or suspend a license for a violation of this paragraph.

(B) Compliance with the terms of an applicable labor peace agreement is a condition of licensure. A licensee seeking renewal of any license shall attest to the department that it remains in compliance with the terms of any applicable labor peace agreement.

(C) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may report to the department that a licensee has failed to provide a truthful attestation of compliance with subparagraph (B).

(i) The reporting party shall provide documentation, in a form and manner required by the department, to substantiate their allegation before the department considers it. The department shall collaborate with such agencies as it deems relevant to evaluate the report.

(ii) If the department substantiates the validity of a report made pursuant to this subparagraph, the department may suspend, revoke, place on probation with terms and conditions, or otherwise discipline the license and fine the licensee.

(D) (i) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may file a complaint with the Agricultural Labor Relations Board that an organization with which a licensee has entered into a labor peace agreement is not a bona fide labor organization.

(ii) The Agricultural Labor Relations Board shall consider all relevant evidence provided or obtained in rendering a decision on whether the entity is a bona fide labor organization and issue a report with its findings no later than 90 days from receiving the complaint.

(iii) If the Agricultural Labor Relations Board determines that the entity is not a bona fide labor organization, the labor peace agreement shall be null and void. The department shall promptly notify
 all licensees that have signed labor peace agreements with the entity that the entity was found not to be a bona fide labor organization and offer those licensees a reasonable time period, not to exceed 180 days, to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization. Failure to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization after that reasonable time period shall be a violation of this section.

(E) For the purposes of this paragraph, all of the following shall apply:

(i) “Employee” does not include a supervisor.

(ii) “Labor organization” means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and which exists,
 in whole or in part, for the purpose of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work for employees.

(iii) “Supervisor” means an individual having authority, in the interest of the applicant, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or responsibility to direct them or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if, in connection with the foregoing, the exercise of that authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.

(6) Provide the applicant’s valid seller’s permit number issued pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the
 Revenue and Taxation Code or indicate that the applicant is currently applying for a seller’s permit.

(7) Provide any other information required by the department.

(8) For an applicant seeking a cultivation license, provide a statement declaring the applicant is an “agricultural employer,” as defined in the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code), to the extent not prohibited by law.

(9) Pay all applicable fees required for licensure by the department.

(10) Provide proof of a bond to cover the costs of destruction of cannabis or cannabis products if
 necessitated by a violation of this division. The costs of destruction include, but are not limited to, all administrative, investigatory, and enforcement costs incurred by the department.

(11) (A) Provide a statement, upon initial application and application for renewal, that the applicant employs, or will employ within one year of receiving or renewing a license, one supervisor and one employee who have successfully completed a Division of Occupational Safety and Health 30-hour general industry outreach course offered by a training provider that is authorized by an OSHA Training Institute Education Center to provide the course. This paragraph shall not be construed to alter or amend existing requirements for employers to provide occupational safety and health training to employees.

(B) An applicant with only one employee shall not be subject to subparagraph (A).

(C) For purposes of this paragraph “employee” has the same meaning as provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5) and “supervisor” has the same meaning as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5).

(b) An applicant shall also include in the application a detailed description of the applicant’s operating procedures for all of the following, as required by the department:

(1) Cultivation.

(2) Extraction and infusion methods.

(3) The transportation process.

(4) Inventory procedures.

(5) Quality control procedures.

(6) Security protocols.

(7) For applicants seeking licensure to cultivate, the source or sources of water the applicant will use for cultivation, as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 26060.1. For purposes of this paragraph, “cultivation” as used in Section 26060.1 shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 26001. The department shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife in the implementation of this paragraph.

(c) The applicant shall also provide a complete detailed diagram of the proposed premises wherein the license privileges will be exercised, with sufficient particularity to enable ready determination of the bounds of the premises, showing all boundaries, dimensions, entrances and exits, interior partitions, walls, rooms, and common or shared entryways, and include a brief statement or description of the principal activity to be conducted therein, and, for licenses permitting cultivation, measurements of the planned canopy, including aggregate square footage and individual square footage of separate cultivation areas, if any, roads, water crossings, points of diversion, water storage, and all other facilities and infrastructure related to the cultivation.

(d) Provide a complete list of every person with a financial interest in the
 person applying for the license as required by the department. For purposes of this subdivision, “persons with a financial interest” does not include persons whose only interest in a licensee is an interest in a diversified mutual fund, blind trust, or similar instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 34.5.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26052.

(a) A licensee shall not perform any of the following acts, or permit any of the following acts to be performed by any employee, agent, or contractor of the licensee:

(1) Make any contract in restraint of trade in violation of Section 16600.

(2) Form a trust or other prohibited organization in restraint of trade in violation of Section 16720.

(3) Make a sale or contract for the sale of cannabis or cannabis products, or to fix a price charged therefor, or discount from, or rebate upon, that price, on the condition, agreement, or understanding that the consumer or purchaser thereof shall not use or deal in the goods, merchandise, machinery,
 supplies, commodities, or services of a competitor or competitors of the seller, where the effect of that sale, contract, condition, agreement, or understanding may be to substantially lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in any line of trade or commerce.

(4) Sell any cannabis or cannabis products at less than cost for the purpose of injuring competitors, destroying competition, or misleading or deceiving purchasers or prospective purchasers.

(5) Discriminate between different sections, communities, or cities or portions thereof, or between different locations in those sections, communities, or cities or portions thereof in this state, by selling or furnishing cannabis or cannabis products at a lower price in one section, community, or city or any portion thereof, or in one location in that section, community, or city or any portion thereof, than in another, for the
 purpose of injuring competitors or destroying competition.

(6) Sell any cannabis or cannabis products at less than the cost thereof to such vendor, or to give away any article or product for the purpose of injuring competitors or destroying competition.

(b) Any person who, either as director, officer, or agent of any firm or corporation, or as agent of any person, violates the provisions of this chapter, or assists or aids, directly or indirectly, in that violation is responsible therefor equally with the person, firm, or corporation for which that person acts.

(c) Any person or trade association may bring an action to enjoin and restrain any violation of this section for the recovery of damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 36.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26053.

(a) All commercial cannabis activity shall be conducted between licensees, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(b) (1) A person that holds a state testing laboratory license under this division is prohibited from licensure for any other activity, except testing, as authorized under this division. A person that holds a state testing laboratory license shall not employ an individual who is also employed by any other licensee that does not hold a state testing laboratory license.

(2) A person with a financial interest in a state testing laboratory license under this division is prohibited from holding a financial interest in any other type of cannabis license.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person may apply for and be issued more than one license under this division.

(d) Each applicant or licensee shall apply for, and if approved, shall obtain, a separate license for each location where it engages in commercial cannabis activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 40.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26054.

(a) A licensee shall not sell alcoholic beverages or tobacco products on or at any premises licensed under this division.

(b) A premises licensed under this division shall not be located within a 600-foot radius of a school providing instruction in kindergarten or any grades 1 through 12, daycare center, or youth center that is in existence at the time the license is issued, unless the department or a local jurisdiction specifies a different radius. The distance specified in this section shall be measured in the same manner as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 11362.768 of the Health and Safety Code unless otherwise provided by law.

(c) It shall not be a violation of state or local law for a business engaged in the manufacture of cannabis accessories to possess, transport, purchase, or otherwise obtain small amounts of cannabis or cannabis products as necessary to conduct research and development related to the cannabis accessories, provided the cannabis and cannabis products are obtained from a person licensed under this division permitted to provide or deliver the cannabis or cannabis products.

(d) It shall not be a violation of state or local law for an agent of the department to possess, transport, or obtain cannabis or cannabis products as necessary to conduct activities reasonably related to the duties of the department.

(e) It shall not be a violation of state or local law for an agent of a state agency, as defined in Section 1100 of the Government Code, or a local agency, as defined in Section 50001 of the Government Code, to possess, transport, or obtain cannabis or cannabis products as necessary to conduct activities reasonably related to the duties of the state or local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 41.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26055.

(a) The department may issue state licenses only to qualified applicants.

(b) Revocation of a state license issued under this division shall terminate the ability of the licensee to operate pursuant to that license within California until a new license is obtained.

(c) A licensee shall not change or alter the premises in a manner which materially or substantially alters the premises, the usage of the premises, or the mode or character of business operation conducted from the premises,
 from the plan contained in the diagram on file with the application, unless and until written approval by the department has been obtained. For purposes of this section, material or substantial physical changes of the premises, or in the usage of the premises, shall include, but not be limited to, a substantial increase or decrease in the total area of the licensed premises previously diagrammed, or any other physical modification resulting in substantial change in the mode or character of business operation.

(d) The department shall not approve an application for a state license under this division if approval of the state license will violate the provisions of
 any local ordinance or regulation adopted in accordance with Section 26200.

(e) An applicant may voluntarily provide proof of a license, permit, or other authorization from the local jurisdiction verifying that the applicant is in compliance with the local jurisdiction. An applicant that voluntarily submits a valid, unexpired license, permit, or other authorization from the local jurisdiction shall be presumed to be in compliance with all local ordinances unless the department is notified otherwise by the local jurisdiction. The department shall notify the contact person for the local jurisdiction of any applicant that voluntarily submits a valid, unexpired license, permit, or other authorization from the local jurisdiction.

(f) (1) A local jurisdiction shall provide to the department a copy of any ordinance or regulation related to commercial cannabis activity and the name and contact information for the person who will serve as the contact for the department regarding commercial cannabis activity within the jurisdiction. If a local jurisdiction does not provide a contact person, the department shall assume that the clerk of the legislative body of the local jurisdiction is the contact person.

(2) Whenever there is a change in a local ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to Section 26200 or a change in the contact person for the jurisdiction, the local jurisdiction shall provide that information to the department.

(g) (1) The department shall deny an application for a license under this division for a commercial cannabis activity that the local jurisdiction has notified the department is prohibited in accordance with subdivision (f). The department shall notify the contact person for the local jurisdiction of each application denied due to the local jurisdiction’s indication that the commercial cannabis activity for which a license is sought is prohibited by a local ordinance or regulation.

(2) Prior to issuing a state license under this division for any commercial cannabis activity, if an applicant has not provided adequate proof of compliance with local laws pursuant to subdivision (e):

(A) The department shall notify the contact person for the local jurisdiction of the receipt of an application for commercial cannabis activity within their jurisdiction.

(B) A local jurisdiction may notify the department that the applicant is not in compliance with a local ordinance or regulation. In this instance, the department shall deny the application.

(C) A local jurisdiction may notify the department that the applicant is in compliance with all applicable local ordinances and regulations. In this instance, the department may proceed with the licensing process.

(D) If the local jurisdiction does not provide notification of compliance or noncompliance with applicable local ordinances or regulations, or otherwise does not provide notification indicating that the completion of the local permitting process is still pending, within 60 business days of receiving the inquiry from the department submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department shall make a rebuttable presumption that the applicant is in compliance with all local ordinances and regulations adopted in accordance with Section 26200, except as provided in subparagraphs (E) and (F).

(E) At any time after expiration of the 60-business-day period set forth in subparagraph (D), the local jurisdiction may provide written notification to the department that the applicant or licensee is not in compliance with a local ordinance or regulation adopted in accordance with Section 26200. Upon receiving this notification, the department shall not presume that the applicant or licensee has complied with all local ordinances and regulations adopted in accordance with Section 26200, and may commence disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26030). If the department does not take action against the licensee before the time of the renewal of the license, the license shall not be renewed until and unless the local jurisdiction notifies the department that the licensee is once again in compliance with local ordinances.

(F) A presumption by the department pursuant to this paragraph that an applicant has complied with all local ordinances and regulations adopted in accordance with Section 26200 shall not prevent, impair, or preempt the local government from enforcing all applicable local ordinances or regulations against the applicant, nor shall the presumption confer any right, vested or otherwise, upon the applicant to commence or continue operating in any local jurisdiction except in accordance with all local ordinances or regulations.

(3) For purposes of this section, “notification” includes written notification or access by the department to a local jurisdiction’s registry, database, or other platform designated by a local jurisdiction, containing information specified by the department, on applicants to determine local compliance.

(h) Without limiting any other statutory exemption or categorical exemption, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to the adoption of an ordinance, rule, or regulation by a local jurisdiction that requires discretionary review and approval of permits, licenses, or other authorizations to engage in commercial cannabis activity. To qualify for this exemption, the discretionary review in any such law, ordinance, rule, or regulation shall include any applicable environmental review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code. This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2021.

(i) A local or state public agency may charge and collect a fee from a person proposing a project pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21089 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 43.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26056.

The requirements of Sections 13143.9, 13145, and 13146 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply to all licensees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 44.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26057.

(a) The department shall deny an application if either the applicant, or the premises for which a state license is applied, do not qualify for licensure under this division.

(b) The department may deny the application for licensure or renewal of a state license if any of the following conditions apply:

(1) Failure or inability to comply with the provisions of this division, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this division, or any requirement imposed to protect natural resources, including, but not limited to, protections for instream flow, water quality, and fish and wildlife.

(2) Conduct that constitutes grounds for denial of licensure under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5, except as otherwise specified in this section and Section 26059.

(3) Failure to provide information required by
 the department.

(4) The applicant, owner, or licensee has been convicted of an offense that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, except that if the department determines that the applicant, owner, or licensee is otherwise suitable to be issued a license, and granting the license would not compromise public safety, the department shall conduct a thorough review of the nature of the crime, conviction, circumstances, and evidence of rehabilitation of the applicant or owner, and shall evaluate the suitability of the applicant, owner, or licensee to be issued a license based on the evidence found through the review. In determining which offenses are substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, the department shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) A violent felony conviction, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(B) A serious felony conviction, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(C) A felony conviction involving fraud, deceit, or embezzlement.

(D) A felony conviction for hiring, employing, or using a minor in transporting, carrying, selling, giving away, preparing for sale, or peddling, any controlled substance to a minor; or selling, offering to sell, furnishing, offering to furnish,
 administering, or giving any controlled substance to a minor.

(E) A felony conviction for drug trafficking with enhancements pursuant to Section 11370.4 or 11379.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (4) and notwithstanding Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5, a prior conviction, where the sentence, including any term of probation, incarceration, or supervised release, is completed, for possession, possession for sale, sale, manufacture, transportation, or cultivation of a controlled substance is not considered substantially related, and shall not be the sole ground for denial of a license. Conviction for any controlled substance felony subsequent to licensure shall be grounds for revocation of a license or denial of the renewal of a license.

(6) The applicant, or any of its officers, directors, or owners, has been subject to fines, penalties, or otherwise been sanctioned for cultivation or production of a controlled substance on public or private lands pursuant to Section 12025 or 12025.1 of the Fish and Game Code.

(7) The applicant, or any of its officers, directors, or owners, has been sanctioned by the department, the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the Department of Food and Agriculture, or the State Department of Public Health or a city, county, or city and county for unauthorized commercial cannabis activities, has had a license suspended or revoked under this division in the three years immediately preceding the date the application is filed with the department.

(8) Failure to obtain and maintain a valid seller’s permit required pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(9) Any other condition specified in law.

(c) The withdrawal of an application for a license after it has been filed with the department shall not deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a proceeding against the applicant for the denial of the license upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order denying the license upon any ground.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 44.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26058.

Upon the denial of any application for a license, the department shall notify the applicant in writing. Within 30 days of service of the notice, the applicant may file a written petition for a license with the department. Upon receipt of a timely filed petition, the department shall set the petition for hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein. Any appeal from a final decision of the department shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26040).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 45.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26059.

An applicant shall not be denied a state license if the denial is based solely on any of the following:

(a) A conviction or act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made for which the applicant or licensee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(b) A conviction that was subsequently dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, or 1203.41 of the Penal Code or any other provision allowing for dismissal of a conviction.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Licensed Cultivation Sites [26060. - 26066.2.]

26060.

(a) (1) For the purposes of this division, cannabis is an agricultural product.

(2) In issuing cannabis cultivation licenses, the department shall consider issues, including, but not limited to, water use and environmental impacts. If the State Water Resources Control Board or the Department of Fish and Wildlife finds, based on substantial evidence, that cannabis cultivation is causing significant adverse impacts on the environment in a watershed or other geographic area, the department shall not issue new cultivation licenses or
 authorize increased production within that watershed or area.

(b) The regulations related to cannabis cultivation shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide that weighing or measuring devices used in connection with the sale or distribution of cannabis are required to meet standards equivalent to Division 5 (commencing with Section 12001).

(2) Require that cannabis cultivation by licensees is conducted in accordance with state and local laws.

(3) Prescribe standards for the reporting of information as necessary related to unique identifiers pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 26067).

(c) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall develop guidelines for the use of pesticides in the cultivation of cannabis and residue in harvested cannabis.

(d) A cannabis cultivator shall not use any pesticide that has been banned for use in the state. An industrial hemp cultivator shall not transfer or sell industrial hemp to a licensee if a banned pesticide was used in its cultivation.

(e) The regulations adopted by the department under this division shall implement the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1.

(f) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall require that the application of pesticides or other pest control in connection with the indoor, outdoor, nursery, specialty
 cottage, or mixed-light cultivation of cannabis complies with Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) of the Food and Agricultural Code and its implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 12.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26060.1.

(a) An application for a license for cultivation issued by the department shall identify the source of water supply as follows:

(1) (A) If water will be supplied by a retail water supplier, as defined in Section 13575 of the Water Code, the application shall identify the retail water supplier.

(B) Paragraphs (2) and (3) do not apply to any water subject to subparagraph (A) unless the retail water supplier has 10 or fewer customers, the applicant receives 10 percent or more of the water supplied by the retail water supplier, 25 percent or more of the water delivered by the retail water supplier is used for cannabis cultivation, or the applicant and the retail water supplier are affiliates, as defined in Section 2814.20 of Title
 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) If the water supply includes a diversion within the meaning of Section 5100 of the Water Code, the application shall identify the point of diversion and the maximum amount to be diverted as follows:

(A) For an application submitted before January 1, 2019, the application shall include a copy of one of the following:

(i) A small irrigation use registration certificate, permit, or license issued pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Water Code that covers the diversion.

(ii) A statement of water diversion and use filed with the State Water Resources Control Board on or before October 31, 2017, that covers the diversion and specifies the amount of water used for cannabis
 cultivation.

(iii) A pending application for a permit to appropriate water, filed with the State Water Resources Control Board on or before October 31, 2017.

(iv) Documentation submitted to the State Water Resources Control Board on or before January 1, 2019, demonstrating that the diversion is subject to subdivision (a), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 5101 of the Water Code.

(v) Documentation submitted to the State Water Resources Control Board on or before October 31, 2017, demonstrating that the diversion is authorized under a riparian right and that no diversion occurred after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2017. The documentation shall be submitted on or accompany a form provided by the State Water Resources Control Board and shall include all of the information outlined in subdivisions (a) to (d),
 inclusive, and (e) of Section 5103 of the Water Code. The documentation shall also include a general description of the area in which the water will be used in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 5103 of the Water Code and the year in which the diversion is planned to commence.

(B) For an application submitted after December 31, 2018, the application shall include a copy of one of the following:

(i) A small irrigation use registration certificate, permit, or license issued pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Water Code that covers the diversion.

(ii) A statement of water diversion and use filed with the State Water Resources Control Board that covers the diversion and specifies the amount of water used for cannabis cultivation.

(iii) Documentation submitted to the State Water Resources Control Board demonstrating that the diversion is subject to subdivision (a), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 5101 of the Water Code.

(iv) Documentation submitted to the State Water Resources Control Board demonstrating that the diversion is authorized under a riparian right and that no diversion occurred after January 1, 2010, and in the calendar year in which the application is submitted. The documentation shall be submitted on or accompany a form provided by the State Water Resources Control Board and shall include all of the information outlined in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, and (e) of Section 5103 of the Water Code. The documentation shall also include a general description of the area in which the water will be used in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 5103 of the Water Code and the year in which the
 diversion is planned to commence.

(3) If water will be supplied from a groundwater extraction not subject to paragraph (2), the application shall identify the location of the extraction and the maximum amount to be diverted for cannabis cultivation in any year.

(b) The department shall include in any license for cultivation all of the following:

(1) Conditions requested by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the State Water Resources Control Board to: (A) ensure that individual and cumulative effects of water diversion and discharge associated with cultivation do not affect the instream flows needed for fish spawning, migration, and rearing, and the flows needed to maintain natural flow variability; (B) ensure that cultivation does not negatively impact springs, riparian habitat, wetlands, or aquatic habitat; and (C) otherwise protect fish, wildlife, fish and wildlife habitat, and water quality. The conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the principles, guidelines, and requirements established
 pursuant to Section 13149 of the Water Code.

(2) Any relevant mitigation requirements the department identifies as part of its approval of the final environmental documentation for the cannabis cultivation licensing program as requirements that should be included in a license for cultivation. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the identification of these mitigation measures. This paragraph does not reduce any requirements established pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(3) A condition that the license shall not be effective until the licensee has demonstrated compliance with Section 1602 of the Fish and Game Code or receives written verification from the Department of Fish and Wildlife that a streambed
 alteration agreement is not required.

(c) The department shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife in the implementation of this section.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the department is not responsible for verifying compliance with the conditions requested or imposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife or the State Water Resources Control Board. The Department of Fish and Wildlife or the State Water Resources Control Board, upon finding and making the final determination of a violation of a condition included pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), shall notify the department, which may take appropriate action with respect to the licensee in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26030).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 47.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26061.

(a) The state cultivator license types to be issued by the department under this division shall include all of the following:

(1) Type 1, or “specialty outdoor,” for outdoor cultivation using no artificial lighting of less than or equal to 5,000 square feet of total canopy size on one premises, or up to 50 mature plants on noncontiguous plots.

(2) Type 1A, or “specialty indoor,” for indoor cultivation using exclusively artificial lighting of between 501 and 5,000 square feet of total canopy size on one premises.

(3) Type 1B, or “specialty mixed-light,” for cultivation
 using a combination of natural and supplemental artificial lighting at a maximum threshold to be determined by the department of between 2,501 and 5,000 square feet of total canopy size on one premises.

(4) Type 1C, or “specialty cottage,” for cultivation using a combination of natural and supplemental artificial lighting at a maximum threshold to be determined by the department, of 2,500 square feet or less of total canopy size for mixed-light cultivation, 2,500 square feet or less of total canopy size for outdoor cultivation with the option to meet an alternative maximum threshold to be determined by the department of up to 25 mature plants for outdoor cultivation, or 500 square feet or less of total canopy size for indoor cultivation, on one premises.

(5) Type 2, or “small
 outdoor,” for outdoor cultivation using no artificial lighting between 5,001 and 10,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.

(6) Type 2A, or “small indoor,” for indoor cultivation using exclusively artificial lighting between 5,001 and 10,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.

(7) Type 2B, or “small mixed-light,” for cultivation using a combination of natural and supplemental artificial lighting at a maximum threshold to be determined by the department, between 5,001 and 10,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.

(8) Type 3, or “outdoor,” for outdoor cultivation using no artificial lighting from 10,001 square feet to one acre, inclusive, of
 total canopy size on one premises. The department shall limit the number of licenses allowed of this type.

(9) Type 3A, or “indoor,” for indoor cultivation using exclusively artificial lighting between 10,001 and 22,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises. The department shall limit the number of licenses allowed of this type.

(10) Type 3B, or “mixed-light,” for cultivation using a combination of natural and supplemental artificial lighting at a maximum threshold to be determined by the department between 10,001 and 22,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises. The department shall limit the number of licenses allowed of this type.

(11) Type 4, or “nursery,” for cultivation of
 cannabis solely as a nursery.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law:

(1) Type 5, or “outdoor,” means for outdoor cultivation using no artificial lighting greater than one acre, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.

(2) Type 5A, or “indoor,” means for indoor cultivation using exclusively artificial lighting greater than 22,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.
